Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Chapter 12. Executive Clemency.

§ 53.1-229.
Powers vested in Governor.

In accordance with the provisions of Article V, Section 12 of the Constitution of Virginia, the power to grant pardons or reprieves is vested in the Governor.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-228; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344, 345.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 3 provides: “That any person under a sentence of death imposed for an offense committed prior to July 1, 2021, but who has not been executed by July 1, 2021, shall have his sentence changed to life imprisonment, and such person who was 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense shall not be eligible for (i) parole, (ii) any good conduct allowance or any earned sentence credits under Chapter 6 (§

53.1-186

et seq.) of Title 53.1 of the Code of Virginia, or (iii) conditional release pursuant to §

53.1-40.01

or

53.1-40.02

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 4 provides: “That notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person may be sentenced to death or put to death on or after the effective date of this act [July 1, 2021] for any violation of law.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $77,376 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted “commute capital punishment and to” preceding “grant pardons.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal & Error, § 11.5.

§ 53.1-230.
Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 3 provides: “That any person under a sentence of death imposed for an offense committed prior to July 1, 2021, but who has not been executed by July 1, 2021, shall have his sentence changed to life imprisonment, and such person who was 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense shall not be eligible for (i) parole, (ii) any good conduct allowance or any earned sentence credits under Chapter 6 (§

53.1-186

et seq.) of Title 53.1 of the Code of Virginia, or (iii) conditional release pursuant to §

53.1-40.01

or

53.1-40.02

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 4 provides: “That notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person may be sentenced to death or put to death on or after the effective date of this act [July 1, 2021] for any violation of law.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $77,376 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Former
§

53.1-230

, pertaining to commutation of capital punishment, derived from Code 1950, § 53-228.1; 1956, c. 344; 1981, c. 497; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-231.
Investigation of cases for executive clemency by Parole Board.

The Virginia Parole Board shall, at the request of the Governor, investigate and report to the Governor on cases in which executive clemency is sought. In any other case in which it believes action on the part of the Governor is proper or in the best interest of the Commonwealth, the Board may investigate and report to the Governor with its recommendations.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-229; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636.